sk-SK: Dizajn snímača vody: Plavákový spínač; Sonda; Lano; Bodový; Iné
zh-CN: 水传感器设计: 浮球开关; 探针; 绳索; 点状; 其他
ru: Конструкция датчика воды: Поплавковый выключатель; Зонд; Кабельный; Точечный; Другой
ro-RO: Proiectarea senzorului de apă: Întrerupător plutitor; Sondă; Funie; Punct; Altele
sl-SI: Zasnova senzorja vode: Plovno stikalo; Sonda; Vrv; Točka; Druga
nl: Watersensorontwerp: Vlotterschakelaar; Sonde; Touw; Lokaal; Overig
pl: Konstrukcja czujnika wody: Wyłącznik pływakowy; Sonda; Linkowe; Punktowe; Inne
fi: Vesianturin muotoilu: Kelluntakytkin; Anturi; Köysi; Piste; Muu
ja: 水センサーのデザイン: フロートスイッチ; プローブ; ロープ; スポット; その他
vi: Thiết kế cảm biến nước: Công tắc phao; Đầu dò; Dây thừng; Điểm; Khác
es: Diseño del sensor de agua: Interruptor de flotador; Sonda; Soga; Punto; Otros
sv: Design av vattensensor: Flottörbrytare; Sond; Rep; Fläck; Annat
hr-HR: Dizajn senzora vode: Plovni prekidač; Sonda; Uže; Točka; Ostalo
de: Wassersensordesign: Schwimmerschalter; Sonde; Seil; Spot; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Design de sensor de água: Interruptor de nível; Sonda; Corda; Spot; Outro
hu: Vízérzékelő kialakítása: Úszókapcsoló; Szonda; Kötél; Pont; Egyéb
it: Design del sensore dell'acqua: Interruttore a galleggiante; Sonda; Corda; Spot; Altro
en: Water sensor design: Float switch; Probe; Rope; Spot; Other
zh-TW: 水感測器設計: 浮球開關; 探針; 繩索; 點; 其他
nb: Vannsensordesign: Flytbryter; Sonde; Tau; Spot; Annet
fr: Conception du capteur d’eau: Interrupteur à flotteur; Sonde; Corde; Place; Autre
da: Vandsensordesign: Flydeafbryder; Sonde; Reb; Spot; Andet
lt-LT: Vandens jutiklio konstrukcija: Plūdinis jungiklis; Zondas; Virvė; Taškas; Kita
th: การออกแบบเซ็นเซอร์น้ำ: สวิตช์ลูกลอย; หัววัด; เชือก; เฉพาะจุด; อื่นๆ
tr: Su sensörü tasarımı: Şamandıralı anahtar; Sonda; Halat; Nokta; Diğer
ko: 수위 센서 디자인: 플로트 스위치; 프로브; 로프; 스팟; 기타
pt-PT: Design do sensor de água: Interruptor de nível; Sonda; Corda; Ponto; Outro
bg-BG: Дизайн на сензора за вода: Поплавъчен превключвател; Сонда; Въже; Точково; Друго
cs: Konstrukce senzoru vody: Plovákový spínač; Sonda; Kabelové; Bodové; Jiné
el: Σχεδιασμός αισθητήρα νερού: Διακόπτης πλωτήρα; Καθετήρας; Τύπου καλωδίου; Σημειακός; Άλλο